North Dakota, session 69, HB1595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 23-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Pregnancy resource centers.
1. For purposes of this section:
a. "Client" means an individual receiving pregnancy counseling or health care
services by a pregnancy resource center.
b. "Comprehensive counseling" means information about all pregnancy options,
including abortion, adoption, and parenting.
c. "Health care service" includes:
(1) Diagnosing a pregnancy;
(2) Checking or monitoring an individual's vital signs;
(3) Conducting or interpreting an ultrasound; and
(4) Providing counseling to an individual on the individual's pregnancy or
contraception-related medical options.
d. "Individually identifiable client health information" means personal information
linked or reasonably linkable to a client identifying past, present, or future
physical or mental health status.
e. "Pregnancy resource center" means an entity that provides pregnancy - related
counseling or health care services.
f. "Qualified health care provider" means a licensed:
(1) Advanced practice registered nurse practicing under chapter 43 - 12.5 ;
Page No. 1 25.0349.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) Physician practicing under chapter 43 - 17; or
(3) Physician assistant practicing under chapter 43 - 17 .
2. A pregnancy resource center that receives state funds to provide pregnancy - related
services shall meet the minimum standards provided under this section as a condition
of receiving funds.
3. A pregnancy resource center that receives state funds and provides health care
services shall:
a. Contract or employ at least one qualified health care provider.
b. Ensure a qualified health care provider is physically present at the entity's facility
when health care services are provided.
c. Ensure each health care provider, whether a volunteer or a paid employee, is
operating within the provider's scope of practice.
d. Retain and make available to a client the counseling services of an individual
licensed under chapter 43 - 41 or 43 - 47 .
e. Ensure any counseling provided to a client by the center or the center's agent is
medically accurate and comprehensive.
f. Ensure any ultrasound service performed on a client by the center or the center's
agent is conducted by a licensed health care provider practicing within the
provider's scope of practice, or a sonographer licensed under chapter 43-62.
g. Ensure ultrasounds are explained to a client by a licensed health care provider,
acting within their scope of practice.
h. Ensure transparent client care by maintaining a publicly available organizational
chart and privacy policy that includes:
(1) A description of each service offered;
(2) The policies and procedures of each service;
(3) A job description for each position; and
(4) A description of the system for maintenance and storage of client records,
including electronic health records, individually identifiable client health
information, and disclosure of any data sharing impacting client records.
i. Meet the requirements of the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act [42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq], and implementing regulations under
Page No. 2 25.0349.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, parts 160 and 164, for all individually
identifiable client health information held, used, or disclosed by the entity.
4. Before qualifying for a state grant under any program, a pregnancy resource center
shall provide to the department:
a. An organizational revenue budget for the most recently completed fiscal year of
the pregnancy resource center's sources of funding, including each government
grant and the total contributions from government, foundation, corporate, and
individual sources.
b. An organizational expense budget for the most recently completed fiscal year
listing the nonprofit's expenses in the same categories as listed on the internal
revenue service form 990.
c. A program expense budget listing the amount of state funds to be used in each
internal revenue service form 990 category.
d. The number of ful l - time paid staff, par t - time paid staff, and volunteers, and how
many of these individuals are licensed medical professionals, including the
licensed professional's title and valid license information.
e. The number of unique clients served during the most recently completed fiscal
year, including the number of individuals provided:
(1) A pregnancy test;
(2) An ultrasound;
(3) A sexually transmitted disease or infection test;
(4) Pregnancy counseling;
(5) Student sexual risk education;
(6) Parenting education; and
(7) Material support.
f. The amount of material support provided, including the number of diapers, packs
of baby wipes, baby clothing outfits, car seats, strollers, cribs, and containers of
baby formula.
5. After completion of a state grant program, a pregnancy resource center shall provide
to the department:
Page No. 3 25.0349.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. An organizational revenue budget for the most recently completed fiscal year of
the pregnancy resource center's sources of funding, including each government
grant and the total contributions from government, foundation, corporate, and
individual sources.
b. An organizational expense budget for the most recently completed fiscal year
listing the pregnancy resource center's expenses in the same categories as listed
on the internal revenue service form 990.
c. The number of ful l - time paid staff, par t - time paid staff, and volunteers, and how
many of these individuals are licensed medical professionals, including the
licensed professional's title and valid license information.
d. The number of unique clients served during the most recently completed fiscal
year, including the number of individuals provided:
(1) A pregnancy test;
(2) An ultrasound;
(3) A sexually transmitted disease or infection test;
(4) Pregnancy counseling;
(5) Student sexual risk education;
(6) Parenting education; and
(7) Material support.
e. The amount of material support provided, including the number of diapers, packs
of baby wipes, baby clothing outfits, car seats, strollers, cribs, and containers of
baby formula.
f. An independent financial audit for each facility that receives grant funding.
Page No. 4 25.0349.02000